Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH

SUBTITLE A. HOSPITAL DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 1107. TITUS COUNTY HOSPITAL DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1107.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of hospital managers of the district.

(2) "District" means the Titus County Hospital District.

(3) "Manager" means a member of the board.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.002. AUTHORITY FOR OPERATION. The Titus County Hospital District operates in accordance with Section 9, Article IX, Texas Constitution, and has the powers and responsibilities provided by that section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.003. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The boundaries of the district are coextensive with the boundaries of Titus County.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 1107.051. BOARD ELECTION; TERM. (a) The board consists of seven voting managers and one nonvoting manager as follows:

(1) one voting manager elected from each commissioners precinct of Titus County;

(2) three voting managers elected from the district at large; and

(3) the chief of the medical staff of the district's principal hospital serving as a nonvoting ex officio manager.

(b) The election order must provide for clerks as in county elections and must specify:

(1) the date of the election;

(2) the location of the polling places;

(3) the presiding and alternate election judges for each polling place; and

(4) the form of the ballot.

(c) The board shall declare the results of the election.

(d) Voting managers serve staggered four-year terms.

(e) An election shall be held on the uniform election date in May, or another date authorized by law, of each even-numbered year to elect the appropriate number of voting managers.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.052. NOTICE OF ELECTION. (a) The board shall give notice of an election of managers by publishing once a week for two consecutive weeks a substantial copy of the election order in a newspaper with general circulation in the district.

(b) The first publication of the notice must appear at least 30 days before the date set for the election.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.053. BALLOT PETITION. A person seeking to have the person's name printed on the ballot as a candidate for manager must file with the board secretary a petition requesting that action. The petition must:

(1) be signed by at least 10 registered voters who reside in the district;

(2) be filed by the deadline imposed by Section 144.005, Election Code; and

(3) specify the commissioners precinct the candidate seeks to represent or specify that the candidate seeks to represent the district at large.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.054. QUALIFICATIONS FOR CANDIDACY. (a) A candidate for manager must be a resident of the district.

(b) A candidate for a commissioners precinct must be a resident of that commissioners precinct.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.055. BOARD VACANCY. If a vacancy occurs in the office of manager, other than the ex officio manager, the remaining managers shall appoint a manager for the unexpired term.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.056. NONATTENDANCE. The failure of a manager to attend three consecutive regular board meetings causes a vacancy in the manager's office unless the absence is excused by formal action of the board.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.057. OFFICERS. (a) The board shall select from among the managers a presiding officer, who shall preside over the board.

(b) A presiding officer pro tem shall preside in the absence of the presiding officer.

(c) The district administrator or any manager may be appointed secretary.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.058. COMPENSATION. A manager serves without compensation, but the board may establish a system and set the amount of meeting fees for attending board or committee meetings.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.059. LIABILITY INSURANCE. The board may purchase and provide the managers with liability insurance the board considers necessary or advisable to protect the managers from risks that might result from serving on the board.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.060. QUORUM; VOTING REQUIREMENT. (a) Four managers, not including the ex officio manager, constitute a quorum.

(b) A concurrence of a majority of the voting managers present is required in any matter relating to district business.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.061. RECORDS OF PROCEEDINGS. (a) The board shall require the secretary to keep suitable records of all proceedings of each board meeting.

(b) After each meeting:

(1) the manager presiding at the meeting shall read and sign the record; and

(2) the secretary shall attest the record.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.062. PERSONNEL MATTERS; CLOSED MEETING. A member or prospective member of the medical staff or a person who serves or is being considered for a position as a medical director of services or departments in the district is a public officer or employee for purposes of Section 551.074, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.063. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATOR. (a) The board shall appoint under terms prescribed by the board a general manager qualified by training and experience as the district administrator.

(b) The district administrator shall receive the compensation determined by the board.

(c) The board may remove the district administrator at any time.

(d) Before assuming the duties of district administrator, the administrator must execute a bond payable to the district in an amount of not less than $10,000 that:

(1) is conditioned on the administrator performing well and faithfully the administrator's required duties; and

(2) contains any other condition the board requires.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.064. GENERAL DUTIES OF DISTRICT ADMINISTRATOR. Subject to any limitations prescribed by the board, the district administrator shall:

(1) perform the duties required by the board;

(2) supervise the work and activities of the district; and

(3) direct the affairs of the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.065. ASSISTANT TO DISTRICT ADMINISTRATOR. (a) The board may designate an assistant to the district administrator to discharge a duty or function of the administrator in the event of the administrator's incapacity, absence, or inability to discharge the duty or function.

(b) The assistant shall post bond and is subject to the limitations prescribed by board order.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.066. APPOINTMENT AND RECRUITMENT OF STAFF AND EMPLOYEES. (a) The board may employ under terms prescribed by the board any employees as considered advisable for the efficient operation of the hospital or hospital system.

(b) The board may spend district money, enter into agreements, and take other necessary action to recruit physicians and other persons to serve as the district's medical staff or employees, including:

(1) advertising and marketing;

(2) paying travel, recruitment, and relocation expenses; and

(3) allowing a physician to use space in a district facility or paying the physician a rent subsidy until not later than the first anniversary of the date the physician is first admitted to the district's medical staff.

(c) The district may provide a loan or scholarship to a person who:

(1) is enrolled in health care education courses; and

(2) contractually agrees to practice in or become employed by the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.067. HEALTH CARE EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS. The board may spend district money, enter into agreements, and take other necessary action to conduct, participate in, or assist health care educational programs for staff members or employees or potential staff members or employees.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.068. LEGAL COUNSEL. (a) The appropriate county, district, or criminal district attorney charged with representing Titus County in civil matters shall represent the district in all legal matters.

(b) The district shall contribute sufficient money to the Titus County general fund for the account designated for the appropriate attorney described in Subsection (a) to pay all additional salaries and expenses incurred by the attorney in performing the duties required by the district.

(c) The board may employ additional legal counsel the board considers advisable.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.069. RETIREMENT PROGRAM. The board may:

(1) contract with this state or the federal government as necessary to establish or continue a retirement program for the benefit of district employees; or

(2) establish other retirement programs for the benefit of district employees as the board considers necessary and advisable.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.070. SEAL. The board shall have a seal engraved with the district's name to authenticate the acts of the board. The board secretary shall keep the seal.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 1107.101. DISTRICT RESPONSIBILITY. The district has full responsibility for providing medical and hospital care for the district's needy and indigent residents.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.102. RESTRICTION ON COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY TAXATION. Titus County or a municipality in the county may not impose a tax for hospital purposes.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.103. MANAGEMENT, CONTROL, AND ADMINISTRATION. The board shall manage, control, and administer the district's hospital or hospital system.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.104. RULES. The board may adopt rules for the operation of the hospital or hospital system.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.105. PURCHASING AND ACCOUNTING. (a) The board may prescribe:

(1) the method and manner of making purchases and expenditures by and for the district; and

(2) all accounting and control procedures.

(b) The district shall pay the salaries and expenses necessarily incurred by the board or by an officer or agent of the board in performing a duty prescribed or required by this chapter.

(c) An officer, employee, or agent of the board shall perform any function or service prescribed by the board under this section or Section 1107.152.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.106. DISTRICT FACILITIES. The board may:

(1) purchase or build facilities for medical purposes; and

(2) rent the facilities or space in the facilities at a rate sufficient to cover the district's cost.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.107. PROMOTION OF DISTRICT SERVICES. The board may market or advertise to promote district services, the orderly operation of the district, and the appropriate delivery of health care in the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.108. EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) The district may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire a fee simple or other interest in any type of property, real, personal, or mixed, located in district territory, if the interest is necessary or convenient to exercise a right, power, privilege, or function conferred on the district by this chapter.

(b) The district must exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by Chapter 21, Property Code, except the district is not required to deposit in the trial court money or a bond as provided by Section 21.021(a), Property Code.

(c) In a condemnation proceeding brought by the district, the district is not required to:

(1) pay in advance or provide a bond for the issuance of a temporary restraining order or a temporary injunction; or

(2) provide a bond for costs or a supersedeas bond on an appeal or petition for review.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.109. GIFTS AND ENDOWMENTS. The board may accept for the district a gift or endowment to be held in trust and administered by the board for the purposes and under the directions, limitations, or provisions prescribed in writing by the donor that are not inconsistent with the proper management and objectives of the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.110. CONTRACTS WITH GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES FOR CARE AND TREATMENT. The board may contract with:

(1) any county for the care and treatment of a sick or injured person of that county; and

(2) this state or a federal agency for the care and treatment of a sick or injured person for whom the state or agency is responsible.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.111. PAYMENT FOR TREATMENT; PROCEDURES. (a) When a patient from Titus County is admitted to a district facility, the district administrator shall have an inquiry made into the circumstances of:

(1) the patient; and

(2) the patient's relatives legally liable for the patient's support.

(b) If the district administrator determines that the patient or those relatives cannot pay for all or part of the patient's care and treatment in the hospital, the amount that cannot be paid becomes a charge against the district.

(c) If the district administrator determines that the patient or those relatives can pay for all or part of the patient's care and treatment, the patient or those relatives shall be ordered to pay the district a specified amount each week for the patient's support. The amount ordered must be proportionate to their financial ability and may not exceed the actual per capita cost of maintenance.

(d) The district administrator may collect the amount from the patient's estate, or from those relatives legally liable for the patient's support, in the manner provided by law for the collection of expenses of the last illness of a deceased person.

(e) If there is a dispute as to the ability to pay, or doubt in the mind of the district administrator, the county court shall hold a hearing and, after calling witnesses, shall:

(1) resolve the dispute or doubt; and

(2) issue any appropriate orders.

(f) Either party to the dispute may appeal the order to the district court.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.112. AUTHORITY TO SUE AND BE SUED. The board may sue and be sued.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1107.151. BUDGET. (a) The district administrator, under the direction of the board, shall prepare an annual budget.

(b) The budget must be approved by the board.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.152. ANNUAL AUDIT. As soon as practicable after the close of each fiscal year, the board shall have an audit made of the district's books and records for the fiscal year by an independent public accountant.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.153. FINANCIAL REPORT. (a) As soon as practicable after the close of each fiscal year, the district administrator shall prepare a report that includes:

(1) a complete sworn statement of:

(A) all money and choses in action received by the administrator; and

(B) how the money and choses in action were disbursed or otherwise disposed; and

(2) the details of district operation during the preceding fiscal year.

(b) The district administrator shall make the report to:

(1) the board; and

(2) the Titus County Commissioners Court.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.154. DEPOSITORY. (a) After advertising in the manner provided by Chapter 252 and Subchapter C, Chapter 262, Local Government Code, the board shall choose by competitive bidding at least one bank to serve as depository for district money.

(b) All income received by the district shall be deposited in the district depository.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.155. WARRANTS. A warrant against district money does not require the signature of the county clerk of Titus County.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. BONDS

Sec. 1107.201. BONDS. The board may issue and sell bonds as district obligations for any purpose relating to:

(1) the purchase, construction, acquisition, repair, or renovation of buildings and improvements; and

(2) equipping buildings and improvements for hospital purposes.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.202. TAX TO PAY BONDS. (a) An ad valorem tax shall be imposed at a rate sufficient to create an interest and sinking fund to pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued under Section 1107.201 as the bonds mature.

(b) The tax required by this section together with any other ad valorem tax imposed for the district may not in any year exceed 75 cents on each $100 valuation of taxable property in the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.203. BOND ELECTION. The district may issue bonds only if the bonds are authorized by a majority of the district voters voting at an election called by the board and held in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 1251, Government Code, relating to county bonds.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.204. REFUNDING BONDS. (a) District refunding bonds may be issued without an election and in the manner provided by this subchapter to refund outstanding indebtedness issued or assumed by the district.

(b) A refunding bond may be:

(1) sold, with the proceeds of the refunding bond applied to the payment of outstanding bonds; or

(2) exchanged wholly or partly for not less than a similar amount of outstanding bonds and the unpaid matured interest on the bonds.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.205. EXECUTION OF BONDS. The board's presiding officer shall execute the district's bonds in the district's name and the board secretary shall countersign the bonds in the manner provided by Chapter 618, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER F. TAXES

Sec. 1107.251. IMPOSITION OF AD VALOREM TAX. (a) The board shall impose a tax on all property in the district subject to district taxation.

(b) The board shall impose the tax to:

(1) pay the interest on and create a sinking fund for bonds assumed or issued by the district for hospital purposes as provided by this chapter;

(2) provide for the operation and maintenance of the hospital or hospital system; and

(3) make improvements and additions to the hospital system and acquire necessary sites for improvements and additions by purchase, lease, or condemnation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.252. TAX RATE. The board shall impose the tax at a rate not to exceed 75 cents on each $100 valuation of all property in the district subject to district taxation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.253. COLLECTION BY COUNTY TAX ASSESSOR-COLLECTOR. Unless the board elects to have district taxes assessed and collected by its own tax assessor-collector under Section 1107.254, the tax assessor-collector of Titus County shall assess and collect taxes imposed by the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1107.254. ASSESSMENT AND COLLECTION BY DISTRICT TAX ASSESSOR-COLLECTOR. (a) The board may elect to employ a tax assessor-collector to assess and collect district taxes by adopting an appropriate resolution before December 1 of any year. The election remains in effect until revoked by a resolution adopted by the board.

(b) The district tax assessor-collector must reside in the district.

(c) The board shall set the term of employment and compensation for the district tax assessor-collector.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.